District of Columbia statutes.
31-3171.13

Relation to other laws.

(a)

Nothing in this chapter, and no action taken by the Authority pursuant to this chapter, shall be construed to preempt or supersede the authority of the Commissioner to regulate the business of insurance within the District. Except as expressly provided to the contrary in this chapter, all health carriers offering qualified health plans and qualified dental plans in the District shall comply fully with all applicable health insurance laws of the District and regulations adopted and orders issued by the Commissioner.

(b)

Nothing in this chapter, and no action taken by the Authority pursuant to this chapter, shall be construed to preempt or supersede the authority of the Department of Health Care Finance, as the single state agency, to establish policy and enforce the rules and regulations governing Titles XIX and XXI of the Social Security Act and other health-care programs under its jurisdiction.

Mar. 2, 2012, D.C. Law 19-94, § 14, 59 DCR 213